test/src/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-nitonawew_gt-norm.yaml
## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wî-nitonawiyêk

     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-nitonâtân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-nitonâtâhk
     PV/e+nitonawêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-nitonâtakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-nitonawin # LOCAL DIR
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-nitonawinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-nitonawinâwâw

     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-nitonâtin # LOCAL INVERSE
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-nitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-nitonâtinân
     nitonawêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-nitonâtinâwâw
